Wisconsin, session 2025, SB681.
do enact as follows:SB681,11Section 1. 15.433 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB681,5,7215.433 (2) Division of alcohol beverages intoxicating products. (a) 3There is created a division of alcohol beverages intoxicating products attached to 4the department of revenue under s. 15.03. The administrator of the division shall 5be appointed outside the classified service. The administrator of the division shall 6be nominated by the secretary of revenue and with the advice and consent of the 7senate appointed, to serve at the pleasure of the secretary of revenue.SB681,6,38(b) There is created within the division of alcohol beverages intoxicating 1products a bureau dedicated to enforcement and a bureau dedicated to legal 2services, permitting, and reporting, with each bureau headed by a director who 3reports to, and serves at the pleasure of, the division administrator.SB681,6,64(c) There is created within the division of alcohol beverages intoxicating 5products a unit dedicated to education and community outreach, headed by an 6individual who reports to the division administrator.SB681,27Section 2. 19.42 (13) (q) of the statutes is amended to read:SB681,6,9819.42 (13) (q) The administrator and employees of the division of alcohol 9beverages intoxicating products.SB681,310Section 3. 20.923 (4) (c) 7. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb681 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb681 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB681 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB681 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB681: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting